Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1522.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Fuel Gas Detector Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commercial building." A building used for a business activity, office, manufacturing, public accommodation, storage, warehousing or other nonresidential purpose. The term includes a factory and other building used for an industrial purpose."Dwelling." A building that contains one or more dwelling units that are or will be rented, leased, let or hired out for 123456789101112131415161718 living purposes."Fuel gas detector." A device that:(1) is battery-powered or plugged into an electrical outlet or hardwired;(2) incorporates a sensor control component and an alarm notification that detects elevations in propane, natural gas or any liquefied petroleum gas;(3) sounds a warning alarm; and(4) meets Underwriters Laboratories Standard 1484 or 2075, as applicable, as the standards are published as of the effective date of this paragraph."Residential building." A dwelling, single-family home, multifamily home, a mixed-use building that contains a dwelling, manufactured home, dormitory or other residential structure affiliated with an institution of higher learning, hotel, motel, inn, hospital, medical facility that houses patients or other residential structure."STATE SYSTEM." THE STATE SYSTEM OF HIGHER EDUCATION ESTABLISHED UNDER ARTICLE XX-A OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949.Section 3. Residential buildings.In accordance with section 7, the owner of a single-family or multifamily home shall install, upon the transfer of property or change of occupancy, at least one fuel gas detector in any room containing an appliance that combusts propane, natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas if fuel gas detectors are not already present. An owner of any other residential buildings, with the exception of dwellings under section 5, shall install fuel gas detectors in accordance with this act. A fuel gas detector shall be installed in accordance with the manufacturer's requirements 20250HB1522PN3194 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and the National Fire Protection Association 715 Standard, as that standard is published as of the effective date of this section.Section 4. Commercial buildings.The owner of a commercial building shall install, or cause to be installed, in accordance with the manufacturer's requirements and the National Fire Protection Association 715 Standard, as that standard is published as of the effective date of this section, fuel gas detectors in any room that contains an appliance that combusts propane, natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas, or in other areas that could be susceptible to a propane, natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas leak, if fuel gas detectors are not already present.Section 5. Dwellings.The following requirements apply to a dwelling:(1) At the time of each occupancy, the landlord shall provide fuel gas detectors in accordance with section 3, if fuel gas detectors are not already present. Each fuel gas detector must be in working condition. After notification in writing by the tenant of any deficiency in a fuel gas detector, the landlord shall repair or replace the fuel gas detector. If the landlord did not know and had not been notified of the need to repair or replace a fuel gas detector, the landlord's failure to repair or replace the fuel gas detector may not be considered evidence of negligence in a subsequent civil action arising from death, property loss or personal injury.(2) The tenant shall keep the fuel gas detector connected to the electrical service in the building or, if battery-operated, keep charged batteries in the fuel gas 20250HB1522PN3194 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 detector, and shall test the fuel gas detector periodically and refrain from disabling the fuel gas detector.Section 6. Municipal enforcement and liability.If a municipality has elected to enforce the act of November 10, 1999 (P.L.491, No.45), known as the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, the municipality shall enforce this act. The municipality shall have the right to inspect buildings and levy penalties for violations of this act. If a municipality has not elected to enforce the Pennsylvania Construction Code Act, the Department of Labor and Industry shall enforce this act. A person shall not have a claim for relief against a municipality that enforces this act in good faith.Section 7. Transfer of building.(a) Duties.--An owner of a residential building shall install fuel gas detectors in accordance with section 3 in the acquired building within 30 days of acquisition or occupancy of the building, whichever is later, if fuel gas detectors are not already present. If fuel gas detectors in accordance with section 3 are not already present, the person acquiring the building shall certify at the closing of the transaction that fuel gas detectors will be installed. A fuel gas detector must be installed in accordance with the manufacturer's requirements and National Fire Protection Association 715 Standard, as that standard is published as of the effective date of this section, at the time of installation in each area containing an appliance fueled by propane, natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas.(b) Liability.--A person does not have a claim for relief against a property owner, a property purchaser, an authorized agent of a property owner or purchaser, a person in possession of real property, a closing agent or a lender for any damages 20250HB1522PN3194 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 resulting from the operation, maintenance or effectiveness of a fuel gas detector. Violation of this subsection does not create a defect in title.Section 8. Civil penalties.A person who violates this act shall be subject to a civil fine of not more than $500 for each violation. The municipality in which the violation occurred may impose the fine and may waive the penalty upon satisfactory proof that the violation was corrected within 10 days of notice of the violation.Section 9. Liability.An owner required to comply with section 3 or 5 is not subject to liability under law of this Commonwealth if the owner:(1) has conducted an inspection of the required fuel gas detectors immediately after installation; and(2) has reinspected the fuel gas detectors prior to occupancy by each new tenant, unless the owner was given at least 24 hours' actual notice of a defect or failure of the fuel gas detector to operate properly and failed to take action to correct the defect or failure.Section 10. Noninterference.A person may not knowingly interfere with or make inoperative a fuel gas detector required by this act.SECTION 11. STATE SYSTEM BUILDING REQUIREMENTS.(A) APPLICABILITY.--EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B), THIS ACT SHALL NOT APPLY TO THE STATE SYSTEM AND THE STATE SYSTEM'S STATE-OWNED AND STATE-AFFILIATED BUILDINGS, INCLUDING RESIDENCE HALLS.(B) REQUIREMENTS OF STATE SYSTEM.--(1) WITHIN 180 DAYS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS 20250HB1522PN3194 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBSECTION, THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE STATE SYSTEM SHALL DEVELOP AND ADOPT A COMPREHENSIVE FUEL GAS SAFETY POLICY.(2) THE POLICY DEVELOPED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL, AT A MINIMUM:(I) ADDRESS THE IDENTIFICATION, EVALUATION AND MITIGATION OF RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH FUEL GAS SYSTEMS AND FUEL GAS-FIRED EQUIPMENT.(II) REQUIRE STATE SYSTEM UNIVERSITIES TO INSTALL OR RETROFIT FUEL GAS DETECTORS WHERE APPROPRIATE IN ACCORDANCE WITH MANUFACTURER REQUIREMENTS AND APPLICABLE NATIONAL FIRE PROTECTION ASSOCIATION STANDARDS WITHIN THREE YEARS OF THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.(3) INSTALLATION OR RETROFITTING SHALL NOT BE REQUIRED IN ANY LOCATION WHERE CENTRALIZED MONITORING SYSTEMS, NETWORKED DETECTION SYSTEMS OR OTHER TECHNOLOGIES ARE ALREADY IN USE THAT MEET OR EXCEED PERFORMANCE REQUIREMENTS FOR FUEL GAS DETECTION.Section 11 12. Effective date.This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.20250HB1522PN3194 - 6 - <--12345678910111213141516171819